Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-876
Invalid contracts not validated.

Nothing in sections 39-855 to 39-875 shall be construed to validate or to attempt to validate any contract which has been held to be invalid by the county.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 13, p. 284;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2112;

R.S.1943, § 39-876.